Utah statutes.
17-30-16.   Temporary layoffs -- Re-employment register.
When necessary because of lack of funds or work an officer may, with the
approval of the commission, be temporarily laid off. Such layoff shall be made
according to the lowest rating of the officers of the class of position
affected, calculated upon seniority under a method prescribed by the
commission. A person serving under temporary or emergency appointment shall be
laid off before any merit system officer. A merit system officer who is laid
off shall be placed upon a re-employment register to be re-employed in the
inverse order in which he is laid off, which register shall take precedence
over all eligible registers.
